Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.050

Licenses or registrations—Renewal.

Every individual licensed or registered under this chapter shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary, as provided by RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 to renew his or her license.

[ 1996 c 191 s 33; 1991 c 180 s 6; (1991 c 3 s 145 repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 2); 1985 c 7 s 54; 1980 c 101 s 7.]